Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB53.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 100.275 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the ordinances, rules, and
regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter governing subdivision plats and
development plans shall be in the form of objective standards that shall be applied
ministerially.
(2) Ordinances, rules, and regulations governing development plans may allow for
discretion to be applied by the approving authority in circumstances where:
(a) An applicant seeks a deviation from the established objective standards; or
(b) The approving authority determines, based on substantial evidence, that a
strict ministerial application of the established objective standards would pose
a specific threat to public health, safety, or welfare in the affected area.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent a planning unit or a commission or
board of a planning unit from holding public hearings or accepting public
comments concerning approval of subdivision plats and development plans.
Page 1 of 1
BR039200.100 - 392 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:27 PM Jacketed